test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aarran_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - aarrân: # 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    aarrân+N+Sg+Nom: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Gen: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Acc: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Ill: arânân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Loc: arânist
    aarrân+N+Sg+Com: arânáin
    aarrân+N+Sg+Abe: aarrânttáá
    aarrân+N+Ess: arânin
    aarrân+N+Par: arânid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Nom: arâneh
    aarrân+N+Pl+Gen: arânij
    aarrân+N+Pl+Acc: arânijd
    aarrân+N+Pl+Ill: arânáid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Loc: arânijn
    aarrân+N+Pl+Com: arânijguin
    aarrân+N+Pl+Abe: arânijttáá
